Tennessee, session 114, SB1150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-2-405, is amended by adding the
following at the end of subsection (a):
The board shall publish the time and place at which the examinations are
administered and the acceptable grade necessary for passage of the
examinations on the board's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1150
002674
- 1 -